District of Columbia statutes.
45-606

Oath to include affirmation.

Wherever an oath is required, an affirmation in judicial form, if made by a person conscientiously scrupulous about taking an oath, shall be deemed a sufficient compliance.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854
1981 Ed., § 49-206.
1973 Ed., § 49-206.